North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 3. Trust Administration. [Repealed]

§§ 36A-22 through 36A-41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 36A-22

, 36A-23, 36A-24, 36A-25, 36A-26, 36A-30, 36A-34, 36A-35, 36A-38, and 36A-41, were repealed by Session Laws 2001-413, s. 1, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to all trustees covered by the provisions of Chapter 36A of the General Statutes, whether administering trust established before, on, or after that date.

Former G.S. 36A-28 was repealed by Session Laws 1999-216, s. 2, effective January 1, 2000.

Prior to repeal of this Article, G.S. 36A-42 through 36A-46 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.